California statutes. Civil Code
(1) The account subject to the dispute has been paid, settled, or otherwise resolved and has been reported as paid, settled, or otherwise resolved on the consumer’s credit report.

(2) The account subject to the dispute has been removed from the consumer’s credit report.

(3) The debt collector has provided to the credit
 services organization or to the consumer the verification information or documentation described in Section 1692g(b) of Title 15 of the United States Code regarding the account subject to dispute.

(4) The debt buyer has provided to the credit services organization or to the consumer the information or documentation described in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 1788.52 regarding the account subject to the dispute.

(5) The consumer credit reporting agency, creditor, or debt collector reasonably determines that the dispute is frivolous or irrelevant pursuant to Section 1681i(a)(3) or Section 1681s-2(a)(1)(F) of Title 15 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 965, Sec. 4.   (AB 2424)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.135.

To protect against fraud and identity theft, when a credit services organization sends a written communication by facsimile, electronic mail, United States mail, overnight courier, or other means that contains personal information of a consumer, the credit services organization shall redact the personal information to include only the last four digits of the social security number, taxpayer identification number, or state identification number, the last four digits of the financial account number, credit card number, or debit card number, or the month and year of the consumer’s date of birth, unless the inclusion of the full number or date is otherwise required by law, or is legally permissible and required to achieve the desired objective. Redacting information pursuant to this subdivision shall not be considered a violation of
 subdivision (w) of Section 1789.13.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 965, Sec. 5.   (AB 2424)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.14.

Before the execution of a contract or agreement between the consumer and a credit services organization, the credit services organization shall provide the consumer a statement in writing containing all the information required by Section 1789.15. The credit services organization shall maintain on file for a period of four years following the completion or termination of the credit services organization agreement with the consumer an exact copy of the statement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 965, Sec. 6.   (AB 2424)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.15.

The information statement shall include all of the following:

(a) A complete and detailed description of the services to be performed by the credit services organization for or on behalf of the consumer and the total amount the consumer will have to pay, or become obligated to pay, for the services.

(b) The consumer’s right to proceed against the bond under the circumstances and in the manner set forth in Section 1789.18.

(c) The name and address of the surety company which issued the bond.

(d) A complete and accurate statement of the availability of
 nonprofit credit counseling services.

(e) The following notice: If you have a complaint about the services provided by this credit services organization or the fees charged by this credit services organization, you may submit that complaint to the Attorney General’s office, California Department of Justice, Attn: ____, P.O. Box 944255, Sacramento, CA 94244-2550.

The information statement shall be printed in at least 10-point boldface type and shall include the following statement:

“CONSUMER CREDIT FILE RIGHTS UNDER STATE AND FEDERAL LAW

You have a right to obtain a free copy of your credit report from a credit reporting agency. You may obtain this free copy of your credit report one time per year by visiting www.AnnualCreditReport.com. You will be able to view your credit report, dispute alleged inaccuracies,
 and obtain additional information at no fee. If requested, the consumer credit reporting agency must provide someone to help you interpret the information in your credit file.

You have a right to dispute inaccurate information by contacting the consumer credit reporting agency directly. However, neither you nor any credit repair company or credit services organization has the right to have accurate, current, and verifiable information removed from your credit report. Under the Federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, the consumer credit reporting agency must remove accurate, negative information from your report only if it is over seven years old. Bankruptcy information can be reported for 10 years.

If you have notified a credit reporting agency in writing that you dispute the accuracy of information in your credit file, the consumer credit reporting agency must then reinvestigate and modify or remove inaccurate information. The
 consumer credit reporting agency may not charge a fee for this service. Any pertinent information and copies of all documents you have concerning an error should be given to the consumer credit reporting agency.

If the reinvestigation does not resolve the dispute to your satisfaction, you may send a brief statement to the consumer credit reporting agency to keep in your file, explaining why you think the record is inaccurate. The consumer credit reporting agency must include your statement about disputed information in any report it issues about you.

You have a right to cancel the contract with the credit services organization for any reason before midnight on the fifth working day after you signed it. If for any reason you cancel the contract during this time, you do not owe any money.

You have a right to sue a credit services organization if it misleads you.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 965, Sec. 7.   (AB 2424)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.16.

(a) A credit services organization shall not provide any service to a consumer except pursuant to a written contract that complies with this section. Every contract between the consumer and a credit services organization for the purchase of the services of the credit services organization shall identify the physical address, electronic mail address, and facsimile number if applicable, of the credit services organization, shall be in writing, shall be dated, shall be signed by the consumer, and shall include all of the following:

(1) A conspicuous statement in size equal to at least 10-point boldface type, in immediate proximity to the space reserved for the signature of the buyer, as follows:
“You, the consumer, may cancel this contract at any time before midnight on the fifth working day after you sign it. See the attached notice of cancellation form for an explanation of this right.”
(2) The terms and conditions of payment, including the total of all payments to be made by the consumer, whether to the credit services organization or to some other person.

(3) A full and detailed description of the services to be performed by the credit services organization for the consumer, including a list of the information appearing on the consumer’s credit report that the credit services organization will seek a reasonable reinvestigation of, as described in Title 15 of Section 1681i of the United States Code, all guarantees and all promises of full or partial
 refunds, and the estimated length of time for performing the services, not to exceed 180 days, or a shorter period consistent with the purposes of this title as may be prescribed by the Department of Justice.

(4) The credit services organization’s principal business address and the name and address of its agent, other than the Secretary of State, in the State of California, authorized to receive service of process.

(b) The contract shall be accompanied by a completed form in duplicate, captioned “Notice of Cancellation,” which shall be attached to the contract and easily detachable, and which shall contain in type of at least 10-point the following statement written in the same language as used in the contract:

“Notice of Cancellation”

“You may cancel this contract, without any penalty
 or obligation, before midnight on the fifth working day after you sign it.

“If you cancel, any payment made by you under this contract must be returned within 15 days following receipt by the seller of your cancellation notice.“To cancel this contract, mail or deliver a signed and dated copy of this cancellation notice, or any other written notice, to(name of seller) at(address of seller)(place of business)not later than midnight (date).“I hereby cancel this transaction.”(date)(purchaser’s signature)A copy of
 the fully completed contract and all other documents the credit services organization requires the buyer to sign shall be given to the consumer at the time they are signed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 965, Sec. 8.   (AB 2424)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.17.

The seller’s breach of a contract under this title or of any obligation arising therefrom shall constitute a violation of this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1177, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.18.

No credit services organization shall conduct business in this state unless the credit services organization has first obtained a surety bond in the principal amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) issued by an admitted surety and the bond complies with all of the following:

(a) The bond shall be in favor of the State of California for the benefit of any person who is damaged by any violation of this title. The bond shall also be in favor of any individual damaged by those
 practices.

(b) Any person claiming against the bond for a violation of this title may maintain an action at law against the credit services organization and against the surety. The surety shall be liable only for actual damages and not the punitive damages permitted under Section 1789.21. The aggregate liability of the surety to all persons damaged by a credit services organization’s violation of this title shall in no event exceed the amount of the bond.

(c) The bond shall be maintained for two years following the date on which the credit services organization ceases to conduct business in this state.

A copy of the bond shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 651, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.19.

(a) Any waiver by a consumer of the provisions of this title shall be deemed contrary to public policy and shall be void and unenforceable. Any attempt by a credit services organization to have a consumer waive rights given by this title shall constitute a violation of this title.

(b) In any proceeding involving this title, the burden of proving an exemption or an exception from a definition is upon the person claiming it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 965, Sec. 9.   (AB 2424)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.20.

(a) Any person who violates any provision of this title is guilty of a misdemeanor. Any superior court of this state shall have jurisdiction in equity to restrain and enjoin the violation of any provision of this title.

The duty to institute actions for violation of this title, including equity proceedings to restrain and enjoin such a violation, is hereby vested in the Attorney General, district attorneys, and city attorneys. The Attorney General, any district attorney, or any city attorney may prosecute misdemeanor actions or institute equity proceedings, or both.

This section shall not be deemed to prohibit the enforcement by any person of any right provided by this or any other law.

(b) The misdemeanor provision of this section does not apply to a seller’s breach of a contract subject to this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1177, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.21.

(a) Any consumer injured by a violation of this title or by the credit services organization’s breach of a contract subject to this title may bring any action for recovery of damages, or for injunctive relief, or both. Judgment shall be entered for actual damages, but in no case less than the amount paid by the consumer to the credit services organization, plus reasonable attorney’s fees and costs. An award, if the trial court deems it proper, may be entered for punitive damages.

(b) Any person, including, but not limited to, a consumer credit reporting agency, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 1785.3, and any consumer of, or user of, a consumer credit report under the Consumer Credit Reporting Agencies Act (Title
 1.6 (commencing with Section 1785.1)), and any furnisher of credit information under the Consumer Credit Reporting Agencies Act, may bring an action for the recovery of damages or for injunctive relief, or both, for a violation of this title. Any person bringing such an action who prevails in the action shall be entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 965, Sec. 10.   (AB 2424)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.22.

The provisions of this title are not exclusive and do not relieve the parties or the contracts subject thereto from compliance with any other applicable provision of law.

The remedies provided in this title for violation of any section of this title shall be in addition to any other procedures or remedies for any violation or conduct provided for in any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1177, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.23.

If any provision of this title or if any application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the title and the application of the provision to other persons and circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1177, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.24.

(a) When a deposit has been made in lieu of a bond pursuant to Section 995.710 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the person asserting a claim against the deposit shall, in lieu of proceeding under Section 996.430 of the Code of Civil Procedure, establish the claim by furnishing evidence to the Secretary of State of a money judgment entered by a court, together with evidence that the claimant is a person described in subdivision (b) of Section 1789.18.

(b) When a person has
 established the claim with the Secretary of State, the Secretary of State shall review and approve the claim and enter the date of approval thereon. The claim shall be designated an “approved claim.”

(c) When the first claim against a particular deposit has been approved, it shall not be paid until the expiration of a period of 240 days after the date of its approval by the Secretary of State. Subsequent claims that are approved by the Secretary of State within the same 240-day period shall similarly not be paid until the expiration of the 240-day period. Upon the expiration of the 240-day period, the Secretary of State shall pay all approved claims from that 240-day period in full unless the deposit is insufficient, in which case each approved claim shall be paid a pro rata share of the deposit.

(d) When the Secretary of State approves the first claim against a particular deposit
 after the expiration of a 240-day period, the date of approval of that claim shall begin a new 240-day period to which subdivision (c) shall apply with respect to any amount remaining in the deposit.

(e) After a deposit is exhausted, no further claims shall be paid by the Secretary of State. Claimants who have had their claims paid in full or in part pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d) shall not be required to return funds received from the deposit for the benefit of other claimants.

(f) When a deposit has been made in lieu of a bond, as specified in subdivision (a), the amount of the deposit shall not be subject to attachment, garnishment, or execution with respect to an action or judgment against the credit services organization, other than as to an amount as no longer needed or required for the purpose of this title which would otherwise be returned to the credit services
 organization by the Secretary of State.

(g) The Secretary of State shall retain a cash deposit for two years from the date the Secretary of State receives written notification from the assignor of the deposit that the assignor has ceased to engage in the business of a credit services organization or has filed a bond pursuant to Section 1789.18, provided that there are no outstanding claims against the deposit. The written notice shall include all of the following: (1) name, address, and telephone number of the assignor; (2) name, address, and telephone number of the bank at which the deposit is located; (3) account number of the deposit; and (4) a statement whether the assignor is ceasing to engage in the business of a credit services organization or has filed a bond with the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall forward an acknowledgment of receipt of the written notice to the assignor at the address indicated therein, specifying
 the date of receipt of the written notice and anticipated date of release of the deposit.

(h) This section shall apply to all deposits retained by the Secretary of State.

(i) A judge of a superior court may order the return of the deposit prior to the expiration of two years upon evidence satisfactory to the judge that there are no outstanding claims against the deposit or order the Secretary of State to retain the deposit for a sufficient period beyond the two years specified in subdivision (g) to resolve outstanding claims against the deposit account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.25.

(a) Every credit services organization shall file a registration application with, and receive a certificate of registration from, the Department of Justice before conducting business in this state. The Department of Justice shall not issue a certificate of registration until the bond required by Section 1789.18 has been filed with the Office of the Secretary of State and the department establishes that the organization seeking a certificate satisfies the requirements of subdivision (f). The application shall be accompanied by a registration fee of one hundred dollars ($100). The registration application shall contain all of the following information:

(1) The name and address where business is actually conducted of the
 credit services organization.

(2) The names, addresses, and driver’s license numbers of any and all persons who directly or indirectly own or control 10 percent or more of the outstanding shares of stock in the credit services organization.

(3) Either of the following:

(A) A full and complete disclosure of any litigation commenced against the credit services organization or any resolved or unresolved complaint that relates to the operation of the credit services organization and that is filed with the Attorney General, or any other governmental authority of this state, any other state, or the federal government. With respect to each resolved complaint identified by the disclosure, the disclosure shall include a brief description of the resolution.

(B) An acknowledged declaration, under penalty of perjury, stating that no litigation has been commenced and no unresolved complaint relating to the operation of the organization has been filed with the Attorney General, or any other governmental authority of this state, any other state, or the federal government.

(4) Other information that the Department of Justice requires, either at the time of application or thereafter.

(b) The Department of Justice may conduct an investigation to verify the accuracy of the registration application. If the application involves investigation outside this state, the applicant credit services organization may be required by the Department of Justice to advance sufficient funds to pay the actual expenses of the investigation. Any nonresident applying for registration under this section shall designate and maintain a resident of this
 state as the applicant’s agent for the purpose of receipt of service of process.

(c) Each credit services organization shall notify the Department of Justice in writing within 30 days after the date of a change in the information required by subdivision (a), except that 30 days’ advance notice and approval by the Department of Justice shall be required before changing the corporate name or address, or persons owning more than 10 percent of the shares of stock in the organization. Each credit services organization registering under this section may use no more than one fictitious or trade name and shall maintain a copy of the registration application in its files. The organization shall allow a buyer to inspect the registration application upon request.

(d) A certificate of registration issued pursuant to this section shall expire one year after it was issued, but may be renewed by
 filing a renewal application accompanied by a fee in an amount to be determined annually by the Department of Justice as is reasonable and necessary to satisfy its costs in complying with its duties under this title to regulate credit services organizations. The Department of Justice may, periodically, increase the fee, but the amount of the fee shall not exceed that which is reasonable and necessary to satisfy its costs in complying with its duties under this title to regulate credit services organizations.

(e) The credit services organization shall attach to the registration statement a copy of the contract or contracts which the credit services organization intends to execute with its customers and a copy of the required bond.

(f) The Department of Justice shall not issue a certificate of registration under this title to any person who has engaged in, or proposes to engage in,
 any activity that is in violation of Section 1789.13, any law prohibiting the use of untrue or misleading statements, or any law related to the extension of credit to persons for personal, family, or household purposes.

(g) The Department of Justice shall maintain on a publicly available internet website a list of the credit services organizations that are registered in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 965, Sec. 11.   (AB 2424)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.26.

(a) The Secretary of State shall enforce the provisions of this title that govern the filing and maintenance of bonds and deposits in lieu of bonds.

(b) The Secretary of State shall charge and collect a filing fee not to exceed the cost of filing the bond or the deposit in lieu of a bond pursuant to Section 995.710 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 633, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.6F. CHECK CASHERS [1789.30. - 1789.38.]

1789.30.

(a) (1) Every check casher, as applicable to the services provided, shall post a complete, detailed, and unambiguous schedule of all fees for (A) cashing checks, drafts, money orders, or other commercial paper serving the same purpose, (B) the sale or issuance of money orders, and (C) the initial issuance of any identification card. Each check casher shall also post a list of valid identification which is acceptable in
 lieu of identification provided by the check casher. The information required by this section shall be clear, legible, and in letters not less than one-half inch in height. The information shall be posted in a conspicuous location in the unobstructed view of the public within the check casher’s premises.

(2) A check casher may be required to file a return required by Section 18631.7 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), this section shall become operative December 31, 2004.

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall apply to checks cashed on or after January 1, 2006.

(B) The amendments to this section made by the act adding
 this subparagraph shall become operative on January 1, 2008.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 341, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.31.

(a) As used in this title, a “check casher” means a person or entity that for compensation engages, in whole or in part, in the business of cashing checks, warrants, drafts, money orders, or other commercial paper serving the same purpose. “Check casher” does not include a state or federally chartered bank, savings association, credit union, or industrial loan company. “Check casher” also does not include a retail seller engaged primarily in the business of selling consumer
 goods, including consumables, to retail buyers that cashes checks or issues money orders for a fee not exceeding two dollars ($2) as a service to its customers that is incidental to its main purpose or business.

(b) This section shall become operative December 31, 2004.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2004, Ch. 17, Sec. 4.   Effective February 23, 2004.   Section operative December 31, 2004, by its own provisions, or sooner as authorized by Sec. 20 of Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.32.

Failure to post information as required by this title, or the imposition of fees or identification requirements contrary to the information posted, shall constitute an unfair business practice within the meaning of Section 17200 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1391, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.35.

(a) A check casher shall not charge a fee for cashing a payroll check or government check in excess of 3 percent if identification is provided by the customer, or 3.5 percent without the provision of identification, of the face amount of the check, or three dollars ($3), whichever is greater. Identification, for purposes of this section, is limited to a California driver’s license, a California identification card,
 or a valid United States military identification card.

(b) A check casher may charge a fee of no more than ten dollars ($10) to set up an initial account and issue an optional identification card for providing check cashing services. A replacement optional identification card may be issued at a cost not to exceed five dollars ($5).

(c) A check casher shall provide a receipt to the customer for each transaction.

(d) A check casher may charge a fee for cashing a personal check, as posted pursuant to Section 1789.30, for immediate deposit in an amount not to exceed 12 percent of the face value of the check.

(e) Any person who violates any provision of this section shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000) for each
 violation, which shall be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General in any court of competent jurisdiction. Any action brought pursuant to this subdivision shall be commenced within four years of the date on which the act or transaction upon which the action is based occurred.

(f) A willful violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(g) Any person who is injured by any violation of this section may bring an action for the recovery of damages, an equity proceeding to restrain and enjoin those violations, or both. The amount awarded may be up to three times the damages actually incurred, but in no event less than the amount paid by the aggrieved consumer to a person subject to this section. If the plaintiff prevails, the plaintiff shall be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees and costs. If a court
 determines by clear and convincing evidence that a breach or violation was willful, the court, in its discretion, may award punitive damages in addition to the amounts set forth above.

(h) This section shall become operative December 31, 2004.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 17, Sec. 7) by Stats. 2004, Ch. 28, Sec. 2.   Effective April 1, 2004.   Section operative December 31, 2004, by its own provisions, or sooner as authorized by Sec. 3 of Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.37.

(a) Every owner of a check casher’s business shall obtain a permit from the Department of Justice to conduct a check casher’s business.

(b) All applications for a permit to conduct a check casher’s business shall be filed with the department in writing, signed by the applicant, if an individual, or by a member or officer authorized to
 sign, if the applicant is a corporation or other entity, and shall state the name of the business, the type of business engaged in, and the business address. Each applicant shall be fingerprinted.

(c) Each applicant for a permit to conduct a check casher’s business shall pay a fee not to exceed the cost of processing the application, fingerprinting the applicant, and checking or obtaining the criminal record of the applicant, at the time of filing the application.

(d) Each applicant shall annually, beginning one year from the date of issuance of a check casher’s permit, file an application for renewal of the permit with the department, along with payment of a renewal fee not to exceed the cost of processing the application for renewal and checking or obtaining the criminal record of the applicant.

(e) The department
 shall deny an application for a permit to conduct a check casher’s business, or for renewal of a permit, if the applicant has a felony conviction involving dishonesty, fraud, or deceit, if the crime is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a person engaged in the business of check cashing.

(f) The department shall adopt regulations to implement this section and shall determine the amount of the application fees required by this section. The department shall prescribe forms for the applications and permit required by this section, which shall be uniform throughout the state.

(g) In any action brought by a city attorney or district attorney to enforce a violation of this section, an owner of a check casher’s business who engages in the business of check cashing without holding a current and valid permit issued by the department pursuant to this section
 is subject to a civil penalty, as follows:

(1) For the first offense, not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(2) For the second offense, not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(h) Any person who has twice been found in violation of subdivision (g) and who, within 10 years of the date of the first offense, engages in the business of check cashing without holding a current and valid permit issued by the department pursuant to this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(i) All civil penalties, forfeited bail, or fines received by any court pursuant to this section shall, as soon as
 practicable after the receipt thereof, be deposited with the county treasurer of the county in which the court is situated. Fines and forfeitures deposited shall be disbursed pursuant to the Penal Code. Civil penalties deposited shall be paid at least once a month as follows:

(1) Fifty percent to the Treasurer by warrant of the county auditor drawn upon the requisition of the clerk or judge of the court, to be deposited in the State Treasury on order of the Controller.

(2) Fifty percent to the city treasurer of the city, if the offense occurred in a city, otherwise to the treasurer of the county in which the prosecution is conducted. Any money deposited in the State Treasury under this section that is determined by the Controller to have been erroneously deposited shall be refunded out of any money in the State Treasury that is available by law for that purpose.

(j) This section shall become operative December 31, 2004.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 9.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.38.

Any waiver of the provisions of this title is contrary to public policy, and is void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 815, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.7. CONSUMER WARRANTIES [1790. - 1797.96.]



  CHAPTER 1. Consumer Warranty Protection [1790. - 1795.8.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1790. - 1790.4.]

1790.

This chapter may be cited as the “Song-Beverly Consumer Warranty Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

1790.1.

Any waiver by the buyer of consumer goods of the provisions of this chapter, except as expressly provided in this chapter, shall be deemed contrary to public policy and shall be unenforceable and void.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

1790.2.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held unconstitutional, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

1790.3.

The provisions of this chapter shall not affect the rights and obligations of parties determined by reference to the Commercial Code except that, where the provisions of the Commercial Code conflict with the rights guaranteed to buyers of consumer goods under the provisions of this chapter, the provisions of this chapter shall prevail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

1790.4.

The remedies provided by this chapter are cumulative and shall not be construed as restricting any remedy that is otherwise available, and, in particular, shall not be construed to supplant the provisions of the Unfair Practices Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 416.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [1791. - 1791.3.]

1791.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Consumer goods” means any new product or part thereof that is used, bought, or leased for use primarily for personal, family, or household purposes, except for clothing and consumables. “Consumer goods” shall include new and used assistive devices sold at retail.

(b) “Buyer” or “retail buyer” means any individual who buys consumer goods from a person engaged in the business of manufacturing, distributing, or selling consumer goods at retail. As used in this subdivision, “person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, or other legal entity that engages in any of these
 businesses.

(c) “Clothing” means any wearing apparel, worn for any purpose, including under and outer garments, shoes, and accessories composed primarily of woven material, natural or synthetic yarn, fiber, or leather or similar fabric.

(d) “Consumables” means any product that is intended for consumption by individuals, or use by individuals for purposes of personal care or in the performance of services ordinarily rendered within the household, and that usually is consumed or expended in the course of consumption or use.

(e) “Distributor” means any individual, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal relationship that stands between the manufacturer and the retail seller in purchases, consignments, or contracts
 for sale of consumer goods.

(f) “Independent repair or service facility” or “independent
 service dealer” means any individual, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal entity, not an employee or subsidiary of a manufacturer or distributor, that engages in the business of servicing and repairing consumer goods.

(g) “Lease” means any contract for the lease or bailment for the use of consumer goods by an individual, for a term exceeding four months, primarily for personal, family, or household purposes, whether or not it is agreed that the lessee bears the risk of the consumer goods’ depreciation.

(h) “Lessee” means an individual who leases consumer goods under a lease.

(i) “Lessor” means a person who regularly leases consumer goods under a lease.

(j) “Manufacturer” means any individual, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal relationship that manufactures, assembles, or produces consumer goods.

(k) “Place of business” means, for the purposes of any retail seller that sells consumer goods by catalog or mail order, the distribution point for consumer goods.

(l) “Retail seller,” “seller,” or “retailer” means any individual, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal relationship that engages in the business of selling or leasing consumer goods to retail buyers.

(m) “Return to the retail seller” means, for the purposes of any retail seller that sells consumer goods by catalog
 or mail order, the retail seller’s place of business, as defined in subdivision (k).

(n) “Sale” means either of the following:

(1) The passing of title from the seller to the buyer for a price.

(2) A consignment for sale.

(o) “Service contract” means a contract in writing to perform, over a fixed period of time or for a specified duration, services relating to the maintenance or repair of a consumer product, except that this term does not include a policy of automobile insurance, as defined in Section 116 of the Insurance Code.

(p) “Assistive device” means any instrument, apparatus, or contrivance,
 including any component or part thereof or accessory thereto, that is used or intended to be used, to assist an individual with a disability in the mitigation or treatment of an injury or disease or to assist or affect or replace the structure or any function of the body of an individual with a disability, except that this term does not include prescriptive lenses and other ophthalmic goods unless they are sold or dispensed to a blind person, as defined in Section 19153 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and unless they are intended to assist the limited vision of the person so disabled.

(q) “Catalog or similar sale” means a sale in which neither the seller nor any employee or agent of the seller nor any person related to the seller nor any person with a financial interest in the sale participates in the diagnosis of the buyer’s condition or in
 the selection or fitting of the device.

(r) “Home appliance” means any refrigerator, freezer, range, microwave oven, washer, dryer, dishwasher, garbage disposal, trash compactor, or room air-conditioner normally used or sold for personal, family, or household purposes.
